Florida, session 2026, SB114.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSubsections (4) and (5) are added to section 30 627.6474, Florida Statutes, to read: 31 627.6474âProvider contracts.â 32 (4)(a)âA contract between a health insurer and a contracted 33 health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001 must require 34 the health insurer and the contracted health care practitioner 35 to issue a joint written notice to each affected policyholder at 36 least 60 days before the effective date of the cancellation or 37 termination of the contract. The notice must be written in plain 38 language and include all of the following: 39 1.âAn explanation of the policyholderâs rights regarding 40 continuation of care and coverage. 41 2.âApplicable timelines for transition of care. 42 3.âContact information for the insurer, the practitioner, 43 and the office for questions or complaints. 44 (b)âThe commission may adopt rules to administer paragraph 45 (a). The office may impose an administrative fine of up to 46 $5,000 for each violation to a health insurer or contracted 47 health care practitioner that fails to comply with paragraph 48 (a). 49 (5)âWhen a contract between an insurer and a treating 50 health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001 is terminated 51 for any reason, the insurer and the health care practitioner 52 must allow policyholders for whom treatment was active to 53 continue coverage and care, through completion of treatment of a 54 condition for which the policyholder was receiving care at the 55 time of the termination, until the policyholder selects another 56 treating health care practitioner, or during the next open 57 enrollment period offered by the organization, whichever is 58 longer, but not longer than 6 months after termination of the 59 contract. The insurer and the health care practitioner shall 60 allow a policyholder who has initiated a course of prenatal 61 care, regardless of the trimester in which care was initiated, 62 to continue care and coverage until completion of postpartum 63 care. For care continued under this subsection, the insurer and 64 the health care practitioner shall continue to be bound by the 65 terms of the terminated contract. Changes made within 30 days 66 before termination of a contract are effective only if agreed to 67 by both the insurer and the practitioner. 68 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 69 641.315, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 70 641.315âProvider contracts.â 71 (2)(a)âFor all provider contracts executed after October 1, 72 1991, and within 180 days after October 1, 1991, for contracts 73 in existence as of October 1, 1991: 74 1.âThe Contracts must require the provider to give 60 daysâ 75 advance written notice to the health maintenance organization 76 and the office before canceling the contract with the health 77 maintenance organization for any reason.; and 78 2.âContracts The contract must also provide that nonpayment 79 for goods or services rendered by the provider to the health 80 maintenance organization is not a valid reason for avoiding the 81 60-day advance notice of cancellation. 82 3.âContracts must require the health maintenance 83 organization and the provider to issue a joint written notice to 84 each affected subscriber at least 60 days before the effective 85 date of the cancellation or termination of the provider 86 contract. The notice must be written in plain language and 87 include all of the following: 88 a.âAn explanation of the subscriberâs rights regarding 89 continuation of care and coverage. 90 b.âApplicable timelines for transition of care. 91 c.âContact information for the health maintenance 92 organization, the provider, and the Office of Insurance 93 Regulation for questions or complaints. 94 4.âThe commission may adopt rules to administer 95 subparagraph 3. A health maintenance organization or provider 96 that fails to comply with subparagraph 3. is subject to an 97 administrative fine by the office of up to $5,000 for each 98 violation. 99 Section 3.âSubsection (8) of section 641.51, Florida 100 Statutes, is amended to read: 101 641.51âQuality assurance program; second medical opinion 102 requirement.â 103 (8)âWhen a contract between an organization and a treating 104 provider is terminated for any reason other than for cause, each 105 party shall allow subscribers for whom treatment was active to 106 continue coverage and care when medically necessary, through 107 completion of treatment of a condition for which the subscriber 108 was receiving care at the time of the termination, until the 109 subscriber selects another treating provider, or during the next 110 open enrollment period offered by the organization, whichever is 111 longer, but not longer than 6 months after termination of the 112 contract. Each party to the terminated contract shall allow a 113 subscriber who has initiated a course of prenatal care, 114 regardless of the trimester in which care was initiated, to 115 continue care and coverage until completion of postpartum care. 116 This does not prevent a provider from refusing to continue to 117 provide care to a subscriber who is abusive, noncompliant, or in 118 arrears in payments for services provided. For care continued 119 under this subsection, the organization and the provider shall 120 continue to be bound by the terms of the terminated contract. 121 Changes made within 30 days before termination of a contract are 122 effective only if agreed to by both parties. 123 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.